Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 27 BUSINESS AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS
§ 26-2731. Construction — Promulgation of rules — Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes.

A proceeding to promulgate rules or a proceeding regarding civil penalties under section 26-2729, Idaho Code, shall be subject to the administrative procedure act contained in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of a licensee’s incorporating statute apply to the licensee. If a provision of the licensee’s incorporating statute conflicts with any provision of this chapter, this chapter controls.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2731, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 14, p. 406.

§ 26-2732. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Business and Industrial Development Corporation Act.”

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2732, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.